en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
FLAG long
SFX DI Y 16
SFX DI n 0          en
SFX DI eln le         eln
SFX DI n e          eln
SFX DI ern re         ern
SFX DI n e          ern
SFX DI n t          e[lr]n
SFX DI n t          [dt]en
SFX DI en t          [^dimnt]en
SFX DI en t          eien
SFX DI n t          [^e]ien
SFX DI n t          chnen
SFX DI en t          [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DI n t          [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DI en t          [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DI n e          un
SFX DI n t          un


SFX DX Y 26
SFX DX n t          e[lr]n
SFX DX n t          [dtw]en
SFX DX en t          eien
SFX DX n t          [^e]ien
SFX DX en t          [^ditmnw]en
SFX DX n t          chnen
SFX DX en t          [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DX n t          [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DX en t          [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DX n t          un
SFX DX st 0          tst
SFX DX n st         e[lr]n
SFX DX n st         [dtw]en
SFX DX en st         [^dimnßstwzx]en
SFX DX en st         eien
SFX DX n st         [^e]ien
SFX DX n st         chnen
SFX DX en st         [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DX n st         [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DX en st         [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DX n st         un
SFX DX n st         [ßsxz]en
SFX DX n st         ssen
SFX DX n st         schen
SFX DX t st         [^sz]t
SFX DX t est        zt


SFX DY Y 36
SFX DY n te         e[lr]n
SFX DY n te         [dtw]en
SFX DY en te         [^dimntw]en
SFX DY en te         eien
SFX DY n te         [^e]ien
SFX DY n te         chnen
SFX DY en te         [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DY n te         [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY en te         [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY n test       e[lr]n
SFX DY n test       [dtw]en
SFX DY en test       [^dimntw]en
SFX DY en test       eien
SFX DY n test       [^e]ien
SFX DY n test       chnen
SFX DY en test       [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DY n test       [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY en test       [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY n tet        e[lr]n
SFX DY n tet        [dtw]en
SFX DY en tet        [^dimntw]en
SFX DY en tet        eien
SFX DY n tet        [^e]ien
SFX DY n tet        chnen
SFX DY en tet        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DY n tet        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY en tet        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY n ten        e[lr]n
SFX DY n ten        [dtw]en
SFX DY en ten        [^dimntw]en
SFX DY en ten        eien
SFX DY n ten        [^e]ien
SFX DY n ten        chnen
SFX DY en ten        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DY n ten        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DY en ten        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en


SFX DZ Y 15
SFX DZ 0 st         [^hßsz]
SFX DZ 0 st         [^c]h
SFX DZ 0 st         [^s]ch
SFX DZ 0 est        [dfkstz]
SFX DZ 0 est        ch
SFX DZ 0 est        [au]ß
SFX DZ 0 est        ieß
SFX DZ 0 est        [io]ss
SFX DZ 0 t          [^dt]
SFX DZ 0 et         [dt]
SFX DZ 0 n          e
SFX DZ 0 en         ie
SFX DZ 0 en         [^e]
SFX DZ 0 est        iess
SFX DZ 0 est        [au]ss
# last two ...ss rules only used for swiss de_CH - but de_DE is unaffected


SFX DO Y 21
SFX DO n tes        e[lr]n
SFX DO n tes        [dtw]en
SFX DO en tes        [^dmntw]en
SFX DO n tes        chnen
SFX DO en tes        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DO n tes        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DO en tes        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DO n ter        e[lr]n
SFX DO n ter        [dtw]en
SFX DO en ter        [^dmntw]en
SFX DO n ter        chnen
SFX DO en ter        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DO n ter        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DO en ter        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DO n tem        e[lr]n
SFX DO n tem        [dtw]en
SFX DO en tem        [^dmntw]en
SFX DO n tem        chnen
SFX DO en tem        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX DO n tem        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX DO en tem        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en


# this one will allow "-Eltern" - Hunspell 1.1.5 bug, but CHECKSHARPS obsoletes LANG de_DE
#LANG de_DE
CHECKSHARPS


COMPOUNDBEGIN Dx
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Dy
COMPOUNDEND Dz
FORBIDDENWORD Dd

# Prefixes are allowed at the beginning of compounds,
# suffixes are allowed at the end of compounds by default:
# (prefix)?(root)+(affix)?
# Affixes with COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG may be inside of compounds.
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Dc

ONLYINCOMPOUND Do

# my PSEUDOROOT h(elper) flag
NEEDAFFIX Dh

# forbid uppercase characters at compound word bounds
# BUT I want to take care about it myself ;-)
# CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE
KEEPCASE Dw

# Affixes  signed  with CIRCUMFIX flag may be on a word when this word also has a prefix with CIRCUMFIX flag and vice versa.
# for decapitalizing nouns with fogemorphemes
CIRCUMFIX Df

# this one would make a separate dict entry "Denkmalsschutz" invalidate the
# compound of "Denkmal"+"schutz". We do not want this feature here...
# CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# make not all possible suggestions for typos of Flicken or some rare words
NOSUGGEST Dn

WORDCHARS ß-.

# - setting this to 2 decreases performance by 1/10 but is needed for "öl" and "ei"
# - setting this to 1 for handling Fuge-elements with dashes (Arbeits-) dash will 
#   be a special word but - is handled as a affix now
COMPOUNDMIN 2

# this ones are for Duden R36 (old orthography)
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 2  #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ee e #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oo o #oldspell
# also need oo o

# this one needs to be flagable to be used for old orthography
#CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE


PFX Di Y 1
PFX Di 0 -/DcDoDyDf .

SFX Dj Y 3
SFX Dj 0 0/DxDoDc .
SFX Dj 0 -/DzDoDcDf .
SFX Dj 0 -/DcDz .

# Female forms for compound/Compound words:
# attention: [^e][^n] does also filter out "...er" !
SFX Dg Y 12
SFX Dg 0 innen/DxDyDoDc [^n]
SFX Dg en innen/DxDyDoDc en
SFX Dg 0 Innen/DxDyDoDc [^n]
SFX Dg en Innen/DxDyDoDc en
SFX Dg 0 innen/DxDyDoDcDf [^n]
SFX Dg en innen/DxDyDoDcDf en
SFX Dg 0 Innen/DxDyDoDcDf [^n]
SFX Dg en Innen/DxDyDoDcDf en
SFX Dg 0 innen-/DcDz [^n]
SFX Dg en innen-/DcDz en
SFX Dg 0 Innen-/DcDz [^n]
SFX Dg en Innen-/DcDz en


PFX Dk Y 2
PFX Dk 0 -/DcDoDxDf .
PFX Dk 0 0/DcDoDy .

SFX De Y 2
SFX De 0 0/DyDoDc .
SFX De 0 -/DzDc .

# for Uppercased end-words to prepend - and lowercase: (Tier/EPSm) (EX: Bettbezüge und *-laken*)
# AND
# for lowercased end-words to prepend - and re-uppercase : (tier/EPSozm) (EX: Arbeits*-Tier*)
#PFX Dm A -a/DcDo A
#PFX Dm a -/ a
PFX Dm Y 58
PFX Dm A -a A
PFX Dm B -b B
PFX Dm C -c C
PFX Dm D -d D
PFX Dm E -e E
PFX Dm F -f F
PFX Dm G -g G
PFX Dm H -h H
PFX Dm I -i I
PFX Dm J -j J
PFX Dm K -k K
PFX Dm L -l L
PFX Dm M -m M
PFX Dm N -n N
PFX Dm O -o O
PFX Dm P -p P
PFX Dm Q -q Q
PFX Dm R -r R
PFX Dm S -s S
PFX Dm T -t T
PFX Dm U -u U
PFX Dm V -v V
PFX Dm W -w W
PFX Dm X -x X
PFX Dm Y -y Y
PFX Dm Z -z Z
PFX Dm Ä -ä Ä
PFX Dm Ö -ö Ö
PFX Dm Ü -ü Ü
PFX Dm a -A/DcDo a
PFX Dm b -B/DcDo b
PFX Dm c -C/DcDo c
PFX Dm d -D/DcDo d
PFX Dm e -E/DcDo e
PFX Dm f -F/DcDo f
PFX Dm g -G/DcDo g
PFX Dm h -H/DcDo h
PFX Dm i -I/DcDo i
PFX Dm j -J/DcDo j
PFX Dm k -K/DcDo k
PFX Dm l -L/DcDo l
PFX Dm m -M/DcDo m
PFX Dm n -N/DcDo n
PFX Dm o -O/DcDo o
PFX Dm p -P/DcDo p
PFX Dm q -Q/DcDo q
PFX Dm r -R/DcDo r
PFX Dm s -S/DcDo s
PFX Dm t -T/DcDo t
PFX Dm u -U/DcDo u
PFX Dm v -V/DcDo v
PFX Dm w -W/DcDo w
PFX Dm x -X/DcDo x
PFX Dm y -Y/DcDo y
PFX Dm z -Z/DcDo z
PFX Dm ä -Ä/DcDo ä
PFX Dm ö -Ö/DcDo ö
PFX Dm ü -Ü/DcDo ü


# Decapitalizing: (not used ATM... )
# /co(f) : compound permit, in coumpount only, (decapitalizing with fogemorphemes)
#PFX Dl Y 29
#PFX Dl A a/DcDo A
#PFX Dl Ä ä/DcDo Ä
#PFX Dl B b/DcDo B
#PFX Dl C c/DcDo C
#PFX Dl D d/DcDo D
#PFX Dl E e/DcDo E
#PFX Dl F f/DcDo F
#PFX Dl G g/DcDo G
#PFX Dl H h/DcDo H
#PFX Dl I i/DcDo I
#PFX Dl J j/DcDo J
#PFX Dl K k/DcDo K
#PFX Dl L l/DcDo L
#PFX Dl M m/DcDo M
#PFX Dl N n/DcDo N
#PFX Dl O o/DcDo O
#PFX Dl Ö ö/DcDo Ö
#PFX Dl P p/DcDo P
#PFX Dl Q q/DcDo Q
#PFX Dl R r/DcDo R
#PFX Dl S s/DcDo S
#PFX Dl T t/DcDo T
#PFX Dl U u/DcDo U
#PFX Dl Ü ü/DcDo Ü
#PFX Dl V v/DcDo V
#PFX Dl W w/DcDo W
#PFX Dl X x/DcDo X
#PFX Dl Y y/DcDo Y
#PFX Dl Z z/DcDo Z

# private hunspell flags:
# --x : not for capmain (rare words)

# With "BREAK -" some wrong forms are accepted but that is needed for US-Wirtschaft etc.
# So enabling this is the lesser evil. No perfect solution found so far...
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK .
