en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
abhielt/DZDE
abplagen/DDDIDXDY
abschor/DZ
Absorptions/DhDiDj
absorptions/DhDkDe
abspecken/DIDXDY
absprengen/DBDIDXDY
abzäunen/DDDIDXDY
Aktivisten/DgDhDiDj
algorithmen/DoDzDm
Allrad/DhDiDj
allrad/DhDkDe
anlachen/DDDIDXDY
Anlieger/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
anmalen/DDDIDXDY
anpacken/DDDIDXDY
anpries/DZDE
antwort/DhDkDe
Anwalts/DhDiDj
Arbeitgeber/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
Areal/DEDPDSDm
assemblieren/DIDXDYDDDO
assoziieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
athleten/DgDhDkDe
auffräße/DZ
aufnehmen/DBDDDI
aufrunden/DDDIDXDY
aufstampfen/DDDIDXDY
aufwach/DhDkDe
Aufwands/DhDiDj
ausging/DZDE
auspeitschen/DDDIDXDY
auspumpen/DIDXDY
ausschütten/DDDIDXDY
aussteller/DgDhDkDe
auster/DNDoDzDm
barbaren/DhDkDe
Bären/DhDiDj
bebauen/DBDDDIDODXDY
beenden/DDDIDODXDY
begleiter/DgDhDkDe
behalf/DZ
beipacken/DDDIDXDY
bekunden/DDDIDODXDY
beläuft/DX
bemerken/DDDIDXDY
berater/DgDhDkDe
berechnen/DSDJDoDzDm
bericht/DhDkDe
Berufungs/DhDiDj
beschämen/DDDIDODXDY
bestahl/DZ
betiteln/DDDIDODXDY
bewerkstelligen/DDDIDXDY
blamieren/DDDIDODXDY
bond/DhDkDe
Bord/DEDPDSDTDmDiDj
boten/DgDhDkDe
bouillonwürfel/DoDzDm
cornedbeef/DoDzDm
dampfen/DDDIDVDXDY
darlehens/DhDkDe
Dauer/DNDmDiDj
davonfuhr/DZ
debattieren/DDDIDODXDY
delegierten/DgDhDkDe
dinieren/DDDIDXDY
dirigenten/DgDhDkDe
dirigieren/DDDIDODXDY
Dogge/DNDm
draufgehen/DDDIDX
dritt/DADkDe
Duft/DSDTDmDiDj
einführen/DBDDDIDXDY
einkellern/DDDIDXDY
einließ/DZDE
einmarschieren/DDDIDODXDY
einreisen/DDDIDXDY
Einsätze/DNDm
einwohner/DgDhDkDe
einzugs/DhDkDe
Elch/DEDPDSDTDmDiDj
enthielt/DZDE
entlohnen/DDDIDODXDY
entrichten/DDDIDODXDY
entwinden/DDDIDX
entzücken/DDDIDODXDY
erfinder/DgDhDkDe
ergänzen/DDDIDODXDY
erhöbe/DZ
erretten/DDDIDODXDY
Errorroutine/DNDm
erscheinungs/DhDkDe
erwachsen/DADDDI
Erweiterungs/DhDiDj
examinieren/DDDIDODXDY
fachsimpeln/DIDXDY
filepointer/DoDzDm
fischer/DgDhDkDe
flattern/DDDIDXDY
flieger/DgDhDkDe
flog/DVDZ
Flur/DSDEDPDTDmDiDj
führer/DgDhDkDe
füllen/DBDDDIDXDY
gefäß/DhDkDe
Geigen/DhDiDj
geplänkel/DSDoDzDm
geradebiegen/DDDIDX
gleichkam/DZ
grenz/DhDkDe
Gruppen/DhDiDj
gymnasiasten/DgDhDkDe
halbieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
heranstürmen/DIDXDYDD
herausfischen/DIDXDYDD
herging/DZDE
herholen/DDDIDXDY
Heurigenliedern/Dm
hineinstellen/DIDXDYDD
hingab/DZ
hochschießen/DIDXDD
honorar/DhDkDe
Hühner/DNDmDiDj
immunisieren/DDDIDODXDY
ingenieur/DgDhDkDe
interagieren/DDDIDODXDY
juristen/DgDhDkDe
kaledonien/DoDzDm
kamel/DhDkDe
Kapazitäts/DhDiDj
kapitulieren/DDDIDODXDY
käufer/DgDhDkDe
kolorieren/DIDODXDY
kommissions/DhDkDe
Kompromiss/DEDPDTDmDiDj
konjugieren/DDDIDODXDY
Konventionalstrafgesetz/Dm
kooperieren/DDDIDXDY
laden/DhDkDe
Langsam/DhDiDj
langweilen/DDDIDXDY
losband/DZ
magenta/DoDzDm
maulen/DDDIDXDY
migrieren/DDDIDODXDYDW
mitspielen/DIDXDYDD
mosern/DDDIDXDYDW
musterungsarzt/DTDoDzDm
nachzahlungs/DhDkDe
Negativ/DhDiDj
niederschrieb/DZDE
nominieren/DDDIDODXDY
Nutzer/DSDNDFDmDgDiDj
Passant/DPDFDm
plantschen/DDDIDXDY
polemisieren/DDDIDODXDY
prophezeien/DDDIDODXDY
putz/DoDzDm
quanten/DhDkDe
Rationalisierungs/DhDiDj
raunen/DDDIDXDY
Reiter/DNDFDSDmDgDiDj
rotten/DDDIDVDXDY
säen/DDDIDXDY
Sauferei/Dm
schmachten/DDDIDVDXDY
schmolz/DVDZ
schutt/DhDkDe
schwinden/DDDIDVDX
Schwing/DhDiDj
sexpuppe/DNDoDzDm
Siedler/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
spalten/DBDDDIDXDYDkDe
stehenließ/DZ
stereotypieren/DDDIDODXDY
strahlofen/DoDzDm
strangulieren/DDDIDODXDY
tages/DhDkDe
tapezieren/DDDIDODXDYDW
Taxi/DSDmDiDj
Töpfer/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
trefferliste/DNDoDzDm
tremolieren/DDDIDODXDY
überdenken/DDDIDX
überquoll/DZ
überstreichen/DIDXDD
übertrainieren/DIDXDYDDDO
umsortieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
unterbrach/DZ
untergliedern/DDDIDODXDY
verantworten/DBDDDIDODXDY
verblühen/DDDIDODXDY
Verbraucher/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
verewigen/DSDJDoDzDm
verglichen/DADWDX
verhimmeln/DDDIDODXDY
verkoppeln/DDDIDODXDY
verlagerungs/DhDkDe
verlieren/DDDIDX
verpuffen/DDDIDODXDY
Verschleppungs/DhDiDj
versehren/DDDIDODXDY
verteidigen/DDDIDODXDY
verwaisen/DDDIDODXDY
verwirren/DDDIDODXDY
vorgab/DZ
vorschweben/DDDIDXDY
werft/DPDoDzDm
widerhallen/DIDXDYDD
wiedergab/DZ
xerographieren/DIDODXDY
zerstampfen/DDDIDODXDYDW
zinn/DhDkDe
zugab/DZ
Zuliefer/DhDiDj
zurückstellen/DIDXDYDD
zurückversetzen/DIDXDYDD
zuschauer/DgDhDkDe
